Washington statutes.
RCW 11.20.050

Recording of wills.

All wills filed with the clerk of the superior court must be noted in the record required to be kept under RCW 36.23.030(7). They may be withdrawn from the record on the order of the court.

[ 2002 c 271 s 1; 1967 c 168 s 17; 1965 c 145 s 11.20.050. Prior: 1915 c 156 s 13; RRS s 1383; prior: Code 1881 s 1356; 1863 p 213 s 92; 1860 p 175 s 59.]

NOTES:

Clerk to keep record of wills: RCW 36.23.030(7).